incubator/apertium-rmy/apertium-rmy.rmy.dix
    <pardef n="/si__vbser">
      <e><p><l>sim</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>san</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>si</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sam</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>san</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>si</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>simas</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sanas</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sas</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>samas</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sanas</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sas</l><r>si<s n="vbser"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dikh__vblex">
      <e><p><l>av</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>el</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>avas</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esas</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>elas</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asas</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enas</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enas</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ava</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>esa</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ela</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>asa</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ena</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ena</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="si"><i></i><par n="/si__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="dikh"><i>dikh</i><par n="dikh__vblex"/></e>
